Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1704
Time-share estate; title; separate estate.

Each time-share estate constitutes for purposes of title a separate estate or interest in property except for real property tax purposes.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 4.